Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board" means the board of occupational therapy practice.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Occupational therapist" means a person licensed to practice occupational therapy under this chapter.

(4) "Occupational therapy" is the scientifically based use of purposeful activity with individuals who are limited by physical injury or illness, psychosocial dysfunction, developmental or learning disabilities, or the aging process in order to maximize independence, prevent disability, and maintain health. The practice encompasses evaluation, treatment, and consultation. Specific occupational therapy services include but are not limited to: Using specifically designed activities and exercises to enhance neurodevelopmental, cognitive, perceptual motor, sensory integrative, and psychomotor functioning; administering and interpreting tests such as manual muscle and sensory integration; teaching daily living skills; developing prevocational skills and play and avocational capabilities; designing, fabricating, or applying selected orthotic and prosthetic devices or selected adaptive equipment; wound care management as provided in RCW 18.59.170; and adapting environments for persons with disabilities. These services are provided individually, in groups, or through social systems.

(5) "Occupational therapy aide" means a person who is trained to perform specific occupational therapy techniques under professional supervision as defined by the board but who does not perform activities that require advanced training in the sciences or practices involved in the profession of occupational therapy.

(6) "Occupational therapy assistant" means a person licensed to assist in the practice of occupational therapy under the supervision or with the regular consultation of an occupational therapist.

(7) "Occupational therapy practitioner" means a person who is credentialed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant.

(8) "Person" means any individual, partnership, unincorporated organization, or corporate body, except that only an individual may be licensed under this chapter.

(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(10) "Sharp debridement" means the removal of loose or loosely adherent devitalized tissue with the use of tweezers, scissors, or scalpel, without any type of anesthesia other than topical anesthetics. "Sharp debridement" does not mean surgical debridement.

(11) "Wound care management" means a part of occupational therapy treatment that facilitates healing, prevents edema, infection, and excessive scar formation, and minimizes wound complications. Treatment may include: Assessment of wound healing status; patient education; selection and application of dressings; cleansing of the wound and surrounding areas; application of topical medications, as provided under RCW 18.59.160; use of physical agent modalities; application of pressure garments and nonweight-bearing orthotic devices, excluding high-temperature custom foot orthotics made from a mold; sharp debridement of devitalized tissue; debridement of devitalized tissue with other agents; and adapting activities of daily living to promote independence during wound healing.

[ 2011 c 88 s 1; 1999 c 333 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 153; 1984 c 9 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Rules—2011 c 88: See note following RCW 18.59.170.